Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2401
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds, determines, and declares that (1) the application of the common law of agency to the relationships between real estate brokers or salespersons and persons who are sellers, landlords, buyers, or tenants of rights and interests in real property has resulted in misunderstandings and consequences that are contrary to the best interests of the public, (2) the real estate brokerage industry has a significant impact upon the economy of the State of Nebraska, and (3) it is in the best interests of the public to codify in statute the relationships between real estate brokers or salespersons and persons who are sellers, landlords, buyers, or tenants of rights and interests in real property.

Laws 1994, LB 883, § 1.